test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-simplex_gt-norm.yaml
     #
     oma+Pron+Sg+Nom: oma
     oma+Pron+Sg+Gen: oma
     oma+Pron+Sg+Par: oma
     oma+Pron+Sg+Ill: omasse
     oma+Pron+Sg+Ine: omas
     oma+Pron+Sg+Ela: omast
     oma+Pron+Sg+All: omale
     oma+Pron+Sg+Ade: omal
     oma+Pron+Sg+Abl: omalt
     oma+Pron+Sg+Tra: omaks
     oma+Pron+Sg+Trm: omani
     oma+Pron+Sg+Ess: omana
     oma+Pron+Sg+Abe: omata
     oma+Pron+Sg+Com: omaga
     oma+Pron+Pl+Nom: omad
     oma+Pron+Pl+Gen: omade
     oma+Pron+Pl+Par: [omasid, omi]
     oma+Pron+Pl+Ill: [omadesse, omisse]
     oma+Pron+Pl+Ine: [omades, omis]
     oma+Pron+Pl+Ela: [omadest, omist]
     oma+Pron+Pl+All: [omadele, omile]
     oma+Pron+Pl+Ade: [omadel, omil]
     oma+Pron+Pl+Abl: [omadelt, omilt]
     oma+Pron+Pl+Tra: [omadeks, omiks]
     oma+Pron+Pl+Trm: omadeni
     oma+Pron+Pl+Ess: omadena
     oma+Pron+Pl+Abe: omadeta
     oma+Pron+Pl+Com: omadega
     #
     muu+Pron+Sg+Nom: muu
     muu+Pron+Sg+Gen: muu
     muu+Pron+Sg+Par: muud
     muu+Pron+Sg+Ill: muusse
     muu+Pron+Sg+Ine: muus
     muu+Pron+Sg+Ela: muust
     muu+Pron+Sg+All: muule
     muu+Pron+Sg+Ade: muul
     muu+Pron+Sg+Abl: muult
     muu+Pron+Sg+Tra: muuks
     muu+Pron+Sg+Trm: muuni
     muu+Pron+Sg+Ess: muuna
     muu+Pron+Sg+Abe: muuta
     muu+Pron+Sg+Com: muuga
     muu+Pron+Pl+Nom: muud
     muu+Pron+Pl+Gen: muude
     muu+Pron+Pl+Par: [muid, muusid]
     muu+Pron+Pl+Ill: [muudesse, muisse]
     muu+Pron+Pl+Ine: [muudes, muis]
     muu+Pron+Pl+Ela: [muudest, muist]
     muu+Pron+Pl+All: [muudele, muile]
     muu+Pron+Pl+Ade: [muudel, muil]
     muu+Pron+Pl+Abl: [muudelt, muilt]
     muu+Pron+Pl+Tra: [muudeks, muiks]
     muu+Pron+Pl+Trm: muudeni
     muu+Pron+Pl+Ess: muudena
     muu+Pron+Pl+Abe: muudeta
     muu+Pron+Pl+Com: muudega
     #
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Gen: mõlema
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Par: mõlemat
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Ill: mõlemasse
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Ine: mõlemas
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Ela: mõlemast
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+All: mõlemale
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Ade: mõlemal
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Abl: mõlemalt
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Tra: mõlemaks
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Trm: mõlemani
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Ess: mõlemana
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Abe: mõlemata
     mõlema+Pron+Sg+Com: mõlemaga
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Nom: mõlemad
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Gen: mõlemate
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Par: mõlemaid
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mõlematesse, mõlemaisse]
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mõlemates, mõlemais]
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mõlematest, mõlemaist]
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+All: [mõlematele, mõlemaile]
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mõlematel, mõlemail]
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mõlematelt, mõlemailt]
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mõlemateks, mõlemaiks]
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Trm: mõlemateni
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Ess: mõlematena
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Abe: mõlemateta
     mõlema+Pron+Pl+Com: mõlematega
     #
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Nom: mõni
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Gen: mõne
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Par: [mõnd, mõnda]
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Ill: [mõnda, mõnesse]
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Ine: mõnes
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Ela: mõnest
     mõni+Pron+Sg+All: mõnele
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Ade: mõnel
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Abl: mõnelt
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Tra: mõneks
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Trm: mõneni
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Ess: mõnena
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Abe: mõneta
     mõni+Pron+Sg+Com: mõnega
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Nom: mõned
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Gen: mõnede
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Par: mõnesid
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Ill: mõnedesse
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Ine: mõnedes
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Ela: mõnedest
     mõni+Pron+Pl+All: mõnedele
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Ade: mõnedel
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Abl: mõnedelt
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Tra: mõnedeks
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Trm: mõnedeni
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Ess: mõnedena
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Abe: mõnedeta
     mõni+Pron+Pl+Com: mõnedega
     #
     iga+Pron+Sg+Nom: iga
     iga+Pron+Sg+Gen: iga
     iga+Pron+Sg+Par: [iga, igat]
     iga+Pron+Sg+Ill: igasse
     iga+Pron+Sg+Ine: igas
     iga+Pron+Sg+Ela: igast
     iga+Pron+Sg+All: igale
     iga+Pron+Sg+Ade: igal
     iga+Pron+Sg+Abl: igalt
     iga+Pron+Sg+Tra: igaks
     iga+Pron+Sg+Trm: igani
     iga+Pron+Sg+Ess: igana
     iga+Pron+Sg+Abe: igata
     iga+Pron+Sg+Com: igaga
     #
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Nom: kumb
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Gen: kumma
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Par: kumba
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Ill: [kumba, kummasse]
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Ine: kummas
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Ela: kummast
     kumb+Pron+Sg+All: kummale
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Ade: kummal
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Abl: kummalt
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Tra: kummaks
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Trm: kummani
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Ess: kummana
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Abe: kummata
     kumb+Pron+Sg+Com: kummaga
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Nom: kummad
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Gen: kumbade
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Par: [kumbasid, kumbi]
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Ill: kumbadesse
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Ine: kumbades
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Ela: kumbadest
     kumb+Pron+Pl+All: kumbadele
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Ade: kumbadel
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Abl: kumbadelt
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Tra: kumbadeks
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Trm: kumbadeni
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Ess: kumbadena
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Abe: kumbadeta
     kumb+Pron+Pl+Com: kumbadega
     #
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Nom: mingi
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Gen: mingi
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Par: mingit
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Ill: mingisse
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Ine: mingis
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Ela: mingist
     mingi+Pron+Sg+All: mingile
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Ade: mingil
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Abl: mingilt
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Tra: mingiks
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Trm: mingini
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Ess: mingina
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Abe: mingita
     mingi+Pron+Sg+Com: mingiga
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Nom: mingid
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Gen: mingite
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Par: mingeid
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mingitesse, mingeisse]
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mingites, mingeis]
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mingitest, mingeist]
     mingi+Pron+Pl+All: [mingitele, mingeile]
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mingitel, mingeil]
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mingitelt, mingeilt]
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mingiteks, mingeiks]
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Trm: mingiteni
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Ess: mingitena
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Abe: mingiteta
     mingi+Pron+Pl+Com: mingitega
     #
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Nom: mitmendik
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Gen: mitmendiku
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Par: mitmendikku
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Ill: [mitmendikku, mitmendikusse]
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Ine: mitmendikus
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Ela: mitmendikust
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+All: mitmendikule
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Ade: mitmendikul
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Abl: mitmendikult
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Tra: mitmendikuks
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Trm: mitmendikuni
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Ess: mitmendikuna
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Abe: mitmendikuta
     mitmendik+Pron+Sg+Com: mitmendikuga
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Nom: mitmendikud
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Gen: [mitmendikkude, mitmendike]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Par: [mitmendikke, mitmendikkusid]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mitmendikkudesse, mitmendikesse]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mitmendikkudes, mitmendikes]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mitmendikkudest, mitmendikest]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+All: [mitmendikkudele, mitmendikele]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mitmendikkudel, mitmendikel]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mitmendikkudelt, mitmendikelt]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mitmendikkudeks, mitmendikeks]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Trm: [mitmendikkudeni, mitmendikeni]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Ess: [mitmendikkudena, mitmendikena]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Abe: [mitmendikkudeta, mitmendiketa]
     mitmendik+Pron+Pl+Com: [mitmendikkudega, mitmendikega]
     #
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Nom: mitmes
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Gen: mitmenda
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Par: mitmendat
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Ill: mitmendasse
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Ine: mitmendas
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Ela: mitmendast
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+All: mitmendale
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Ade: mitmendal
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Abl: mitmendalt
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Tra: mitmendaks
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Trm: mitmendani
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Ess: mitmendana
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Abe: mitmendata
     mitmes+Pron+Sg+Com: mitmendaga
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Nom: mitmendad
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Gen: mitmendate
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Par: mitmendaid
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mitmendatesse, mitmendaisse]
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mitmendates, mitmendais]
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mitmendatest, mitmendaist]
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+All: [mitmendatele, mitmendaile]
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mitmendatel, mitmendail]
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mitmendatelt, mitmendailt]
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mitmendateks, mitmendaiks]
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Trm: mitmendateni
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Ess: mitmendatena
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Abe: mitmendateta
     mitmes+Pron+Pl+Com: mitmendatega
     #
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Nom: mitu
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Gen: mitme
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Par: mitut
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Ill: mitmesse
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Ine: mitmes
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Ela: mitmest
     mitu+Pron+Sg+All: mitmele
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Ade: mitmel
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Abl: mitmelt
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Tra: mitmeks
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Trm: mitmeni
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Ess: mitmena
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Abe: mitmeta
     mitu+Pron+Sg+Com: mitmega
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Nom: mitmed
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Gen: mitmete
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Par: mitmeid
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mitmetesse, mitmeisse]
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mitmetes, mitmeis]
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mitmetest, mitmeist]
     mitu+Pron+Pl+All: [mitmetele, mitmeile]
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mitmetel, mitmeil]
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mitmetelt, mitmeilt]
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mitmeteks, mitmeiks]
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Trm: mitmeteni
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Ess: mitmetena
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Abe: mitmeteta
     mitu+Pron+Pl+Com: mitmetega
     #
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Nom: mõningas
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Gen: mõninga
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Par: mõningat
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Ill: mõningasse
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Ine: mõningas
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Ela: mõningast
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+All: mõningale
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Ade: mõningal
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Abl: mõningalt
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Tra: mõningaks
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Trm: mõningani
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Ess: mõningana
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Abe: mõningata
     mõningas+Pron+Sg+Com: mõningaga
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Nom: mõningad
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Gen: mõningate
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Par: mõningaid
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mõningatesse, mõningaisse]
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mõningates, mõningais]
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mõningatest, mõningaist]
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+All: [mõningatele, mõningaile]
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mõningatel, mõningail]
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mõningatelt, mõningailt]
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mõningateks, mõningaiks]
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Trm: mõningateni
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Ess: mõningatena
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Abe: mõningateta
     mõningas+Pron+Pl+Com: mõningatega
     #
     palju+Pron+Sg+Nom: palju
     palju+Pron+Sg+Gen: palju
     palju+Pron+Sg+Par: paljut
     palju+Pron+Sg+Ill: paljusse
     palju+Pron+Sg+Ine: paljus
     palju+Pron+Sg+Ela: paljust
     palju+Pron+Sg+All: paljule
     palju+Pron+Sg+Ade: paljul
     palju+Pron+Sg+Abl: paljult
     palju+Pron+Sg+Tra: paljuks
     palju+Pron+Sg+Trm: paljuni
     palju+Pron+Sg+Ess: paljuna
     palju+Pron+Sg+Abe: paljuta
     palju+Pron+Sg+Com: paljuga
     palju+Pron+Pl+Nom: paljud
     palju+Pron+Pl+Gen: paljude
     palju+Pron+Pl+Par: paljusid
     palju+Pron+Pl+Ill: paljudesse
     palju+Pron+Pl+Ine: paljudes
     palju+Pron+Pl+Ela: paljudest
     palju+Pron+Pl+All: paljudele
     palju+Pron+Pl+Ade: paljudel
     palju+Pron+Pl+Abl: paljudelt
     palju+Pron+Pl+Tra: paljudeks
     palju+Pron+Pl+Trm: paljudeni
     palju+Pron+Pl+Ess: paljudena
     palju+Pron+Pl+Abe: paljudeta
     palju+Pron+Pl+Com: paljudega
     #
     sama+Pron+Sg+Nom: sama
     sama+Pron+Sg+Gen: sama
     sama+Pron+Sg+Par: sama
     sama+Pron+Sg+Ill: samasse
     sama+Pron+Sg+Ine: samas
     sama+Pron+Sg+Ela: samast
     sama+Pron+Sg+All: samale
     sama+Pron+Sg+Ade: samal
     sama+Pron+Sg+Abl: samalt
     sama+Pron+Sg+Tra: samaks
     sama+Pron+Sg+Trm: samani
     sama+Pron+Sg+Ess: samana
     sama+Pron+Sg+Abe: samata
     sama+Pron+Sg+Com: samaga
     sama+Pron+Pl+Nom: samad
